Massachusetts, session 194th, H4383.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
To amend the Town Charter, Section C-3-2 (a) SELECT BOARD, as follows: 
Proposed addition(s) in bold and underscored, deletions by strike through: 
(a) …No person shall serve on the select board while at the same time serving as a 
town employee. Members of the select board shall be ineligible to serve in any other elected 
position established by this charter or by-law. Members of the select board shall be ineligible to 
serve on multi-member bodies established by this charter or by by-law to which the select board 
is the appointing authority, except where such appointment anticipates that the board member 
will represent the select board on such multiple-member body.  
And further remove the second paragraph in sub-paragraph (b): 
Members of the select board shall be ineligible to serve on multi-members bodies 
established by this charter or by by-law to which the select board is the appointing authority, 

of 2 12 except where such appointment contemplates that the board member will represent the select 
board on such a multi-member body. 
Or take any other action relative thereon or in relation thereto.